Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-192
Nebraska Brand Committee; employees; executive director; duties; chief investigator; brand recorder; grievance procedure.

(1) The Nebraska Brand Committee shall employ such employees as may be necessary to properly carry out the Livestock Brand Act and section 54-415, fix the salaries of such employees, and make such expenditures as are necessary to properly carry out such act and section. Employees of the brand committee shall receive mileage computed at the rate provided in section 81-1176. The brand committee shall select and designate a location or locations where the brand committee shall keep and maintain an office and where records of the brand inspection and investigation proceedings, transactions, communications, brand registrations, and official acts shall be kept.

(2) The brand committee shall appoint an executive director who shall be the brand committee head for administrative purposes. The appointment shall be subject to the approval of the Governor. The executive director shall keep a record of all proceedings, transactions, communications, and official acts of the brand committee, shall be custodian of all records of the brand committee, and shall perform such other duties as may be required by the brand committee. The executive director shall call a meeting at the direction of the chairperson of the brand committee, or in his or her absence the vice-chairperson, or upon the written request of two or more members of the brand committee. The executive director shall have supervisory authority to direct and control all full-time and part-time employees of the brand committee. This authority allows the executive director to hire employees as are needed on an interim basis subject to approval or confirmation by the brand committee for regular employment. The executive director may place employees on probation and may discharge an employee.

(3) The brand committee shall employ a chief investigator who shall report to the executive director. The chief investigator shall meet the qualifications of an investigator as defined in section 54-182. Under the direction of the executive director, the chief investigator shall be chief of field operations and supervise brand committee investigators and inspectors.

(4) The brand committee shall employ a brand recorder who shall be responsible for the processing of all applications for new livestock brands, the transfer of ownership of existing livestock brands, the maintenance of accurate and permanent records relating to livestock brands, and such other duties as may be required by the brand committee.

(5) If any employee of the brand committee after having been disciplined, placed on probation, or having had his or her services terminated desires to have a hearing before the entire brand committee, such a hearing shall be granted as soon as is practicable and convenient for all persons concerned. The request for such a hearing shall be made in writing by the employee alleging the grievance and shall be directed to the executive director. After hearing all testimony surrounding the grievance of such employee, the brand committee, at its discretion, may approve, rescind, nullify, or amend all actions as previously taken by the executive director.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 23;

Laws 2007, LB422, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB600, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB660, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 11.
January 1, 2027